Florida, session 2026, SB900.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 95 96 Section 1.âEffective October 1, 2027, paragraph (d) of 97 subsection (8) of section 322.051, Florida Statutes, is amended, 98 and paragraph (f) is added to that subsection, to read: 99 322.051âIdentification cards.â 100 (8) 101 (d)âThe department shall include symbols representing the 102 following on an identification card upon the payment of an 103 additional $1 fee by an applicant who meets the requirements of 104 subsection (1) and presents his or her: 105 1.âLifetime freshwater fishing license; 106 2.âLifetime saltwater fishing license; 107 3.âLifetime hunting license; or 108 4.âLifetime sportsmanâs license; or 109 5.âLifetime boater safety identification card. 110 111 A person may replace his or her identification card before its 112 expiration date with a card that includes his or her status as a 113 lifetime licensee or boater safety cardholder upon surrender of 114 his or her current identification card, payment of a $2 fee to 115 be deposited into the Highway Safety Operating Trust Fund, and 116 presentation of the personâs lifetime license or card. If the 117 sole purpose of the replacement identification card is the 118 inclusion of the applicantâs status as a lifetime licensee or 119 cardholder, the replacement identification card must be issued 120 without payment of the fee required in s. 322.21(1)(f)3.c. 121 (f)âThe department shall issue an original, renewal, or 122 replacement identification card, as applicable, which includes a 123 symbol representing a lifetime boater safety identification card 124 upon the applicantâs presentation of his or her Florida boating 125 safety identification card or shall provide a receipt of 126 confirmation by the Fish and Wildlife Conservation Commission 127 that the applicant was issued a Florida boating safety 128 identification card. The department shall include the lifetime 129 boater safety identification card symbol on an original, 130 renewal, or replacement identification card with no additional 131 fee to the applicant for the designation. If the sole purpose of 132 a replacement identification card is the inclusion of the 133 applicantâs status as a lifetime boater safety cardholder, the 134 replacement identification card must be issued without payment 135 of the fee required by s. 322.21(1)(f). 136 Section 2.âEffective October 1, 2027, present subsections 137 (5) through (10) of section 322.08, Florida Statutes, are 138 redesignated as subsections (6) through (11), respectively, and 139 a new subsection (5) is added to that section, to read: 140 322.08âApplication for license; requirements for license 141 and identification card forms.â 142 (5)âEach such application must indicate whether the 143 applicant has obtained a Florida boating safety identification 144 card pursuant to s. 327.395, and, if so, a copy of such card 145 must be submitted with the application. For purposes of 146 administering this subsection, the Fish and Wildlife 147 Conservation Commission may provide to the department any record 148 documenting the applicantâs completion of a boating safety 149 education course meeting the requirements of s. 327.395 or 150 issuance of a Florida boating safety identification card. 151 Section 3.âEffective October 1, 2027, paragraph (e) of 152 subsection (1) of section 322.14, Florida Statutes, is amended, 153 and paragraph (g) is added to that subsection, to read: 154 322.14âLicenses issued to drivers.â 155 (1) 156 (e)âThe department shall include symbols representing the 157 following on a driver license upon the payment of an additional 158 $1 fee by an applicant who meets the requirements of s. 322.08 159 and presents his or her: 160 1.âLifetime freshwater fishing license; 161 2.âLifetime saltwater fishing license; 162 3.âLifetime hunting license; or 163 4.âLifetime sportsmanâs license; or 164 5.âLifetime boater safety identification card. 165 166 A person may replace his or her driver license before its 167 expiration date with a license that includes his or her status 168 as a lifetime licensee or boater safety cardholder upon 169 surrender of his or her current driver license, payment of a $2 170 fee to be deposited into the Highway Safety Operating Trust 171 Fund, and presentation of the personâs lifetime license or 172 identification card. If the sole purpose of the replacement 173 driver license is the inclusion of the applicantâs status as a 174 lifetime licensee or cardholder, the replacement driver license 175 must be issued without payment of the fee required in s. 176 322.21(1)(e). 177 (g)âThe department shall issue an original, renewal, or 178 replacement driver license, as applicable, which includes a 179 symbol representing a lifetime boater safety identification card 180 upon the applicantâs presentation of his or her Florida boating 181 safety identification card or a receipt of confirmation by the 182 Fish and Wildlife Conservation Commission that the applicant has 183 been issued a Florida boating safety identification card. The 184 department shall include the lifetime boater safety 185 identification card symbol on an original, renewal, or 186 replacement driver license with no additional fee to the 187 applicant for the designation. If the sole purpose of a 188 replacement driver license is the inclusion of the applicantâs 189 status as a lifetime boater safety cardholder, the replacement 190 driver license must be issued without payment of the fee 191 required by s. 322.21(1)(e). 192 Section 4.âParagraphs (a) and (b) of subsection (5) of 193 section 327.30, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 194 327.30âCollisions, accidents, and casualties.â 195 (5)âIt is unlawful for a person operating a vessel involved 196 in an accident or injury to leave the scene of the accident or 197 injury without giving all possible aid to all persons involved 198 and making a reasonable effort to locate the owner or persons 199 affected and subsequently complying with and notifying the 200 appropriate law enforcement official as required under this 201 section. 202 (a)âA person who violates this subsection with respect to 203 an accident resulting in: 204 1.âProperty damage only, commits a misdemeanor of the first 205 second degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 206 775.083. 207 2.âInjury to a person other than serious bodily injury, 208 commits a felony of the third degree, punishable as provided in 209 s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 210 3.âSerious bodily injury, commits a felony of the second 211 degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 212 775.084. 213 4.âThe death of another person or an unborn child, commits 214 a felony of the first degree, punishable as provided in s. 215 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 216 (b)âA person who willfully commits a violation of 217 subparagraph (a)4. while boating under the influence as set 218 forth in 327.35(1) must be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term 219 of imprisonment of 4 years. 220 Section 5.âSubsection (1) and paragraph (a) of subsection 221 (3) of section 327.33, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 222 327.33âReckless or careless operation of vessel.â 223 (1)âIt is unlawful to operate a vessel in a reckless 224 manner. A person who operates any vessel, or manipulates any 225 water skis, aquaplane, or similar device, in willful or wanton 226 disregard for the safety of persons or property at a speed or in 227 a manner as to endanger, or likely to endanger, life or limb, or 228 damage the property of, or injure a person commits is guilty of 229 reckless operation of a vessel. Reckless operation of a vessel 230 includes, but is not limited to, a violation of s. 327.331(6). 231 Except as provided in subsection (2), if a person violates this 232 subsection and the violation: 233 (a)âDoes not result in an accident, the person commits a 234 misdemeanor of the second degree, punishable as provided in s. 235 775.082 or s. 775.083. 236 (b)âResults in an accident that causes damage to the 237 property or person of another, the person commits a misdemeanor 238 of the first degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 239 775.083. 240 (c)âResults in an accident that causes serious bodily 241 injury as defined in s. 316.192, the person commits a felony of 242 the third degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 243 775.083, or s. 775.084. As used in this paragraph, the term 244 âserious bodily injuryâ means an injury to a person which 245 creates a serious personal disfigurement or protracted loss or 246 impairment of the function of a bodily member or organ. 247 (3)âEach person operating a vessel upon the waters of this 248 state shall comply with the navigation rules. 249 (a)âA person who violates a the navigation rule rules and 250 such the violation results in a boating accident causing serious 251 bodily injury as defined in s. 327.353 or death, but the 252 violation does not constitute reckless operation of a vessel, 253 commits a felony misdemeanor of the third second degree, 254 punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083. 255 Section 6.âEffective October 1, 2027, present subsection 256 (10) of section 327.35, Florida Statutes, is redesignated as 257 subsection (11), a new subsection (10) is added to that section, 258 and subsections (1) through (6) of that section are amended, to 259 read: 260 327.35âBoating under the influence; penalties; âdesignated 261 drivers.ââ 262 (1)âA person commits is guilty of the offense of boating 263 under the influence and is subject to punishment as provided in 264 subsection (2) if the person is in physical control of operating 265 a vessel within this state and any of the following applies: 266 (a)âThe person is under the influence of alcoholic 267 beverages, any chemical substance set forth in s. 877.111, or 268 any substance controlled under chapter 893, when affected to the 269 extent that the personâs normal faculties are impaired.; 270 (b)âThe person has a blood-alcohol level of 0.08 or more 271 grams of alcohol per 100 milliliters of blood.; or 272 (c)âThe person has a breath-alcohol level of 0.08 or more 273 grams of alcohol per 210 liters of breath. 274 (2)(a)âExcept as provided in paragraph (b), subsection (3), 275 or subsection (4), a any person who is convicted of a violation 276 of subsection (1) is subject to the following shall be punished: 277 1.âBy A fine of: 278 a.âNot less than $500 or more than $1,000 for a first 279 conviction. 280 b.âNot less than $1,000 or more than $2,000 for a second 281 conviction; and 282 2.âBy Imprisonment for: 283 a.âNot more than 6 months for a first conviction. 284 b.âNot more than 9 months for a second conviction. 285 286 The clerk shall remit the portion of a fine imposed in excess of 287 $500 pursuant to sub-subparagraph 1.a. and the portion of a fine 288 imposed in excess of $1,000 pursuant to sub-subparagraph 1.b., 289 shall be remitted by the clerk to the Department of Revenue for 290 deposit into the General Revenue Fund. 291 (b)1.âA Any person who is convicted of a third violation of 292 this section for an offense that occurs within 10 years after a 293 prior conviction for a violation of this section commits a 294 felony of the third degree, punishable as provided in s. 295 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. In addition, if the 296 convicted person qualifies for a permanent or restricted 297 license, the court shall order the mandatory placement of an 298 ignition interlock device approved by the department in 299 accordance with s. 316.1938 upon all vehicles and vessels 300 individually or jointly leased or owned and routinely operated 301 by the convicted person. The ignition interlock device must be 302 installed at the convicted personâs sole expense for not less 303 than 2 continuous years. 304 2.âA Any person who is convicted of a third violation of 305 this section for an offense that occurs more than 10 years after 306 the date of a prior conviction for a violation of this section 307 is subject to shall be punished by a fine of not less than 308 $2,000 or more than $5,000 and by imprisonment for not more than 309 12 months. The clerk shall remit the portion of a fine imposed 310 in excess of $2,500 pursuant to this subparagraph shall be 311 remitted by the clerk to the Department of Revenue for deposit 312 into the General Revenue Fund. In addition, if the convicted 313 person qualifies for a permanent or restricted license, the 314 court shall order the mandatory placement of an ignition 315 interlock device approved by the department in accordance with 316 s. 316.1938 upon all vehicles and vessels individually or 317 jointly leased or owned and routinely operated by the convicted 318 person. The ignition interlock device must be installed at the 319 convicted personâs sole expense for not less than 2 continuous 320 years. 321 3.âAny person who is convicted of a fourth or subsequent 322 violation of this section, regardless of when any prior 323 conviction for a violation of this section occurred, commits a 324 felony of the third degree, punishable as provided in s. 325 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 326 327 However, the fine imposed for such fourth or subsequent 328 violation may not be less than $2,000. The clerk shall remit the 329 portion of such fine imposed in excess of $1,000 shall be 330 remitted by the clerk to the Department of Revenue for deposit 331 into the General Revenue Fund. In addition to the penalties 332 specified in paragraph (a), the court may order the placement of 333 an ignition interlock device approved by the department in 334 accordance with s. 316.1938 upon all vehicles and vessels 335 individually or jointly leased or owned and routinely operated 336 by the convicted person if, at the time of the offense, the 337 person had a blood-alcohol level or breath-alcohol level of 0.08 338 or higher. The ignition interlock device must be installed at 339 the convicted personâs sole expense for not less than 6 340 continuous months. 341 (3)(a)âA Any person who: 342 1.âViolates Who is in violation of subsection (1); 343 2.âWho Operates a vessel; and 344 3.âWho, By reason of such operation, causes or contributes 345 to causing: 346 a.âDamage to the property or person of another commits a 347 misdemeanor of the first degree, punishable as provided in s. 348 775.082 or s. 775.083. 349 b.âSerious bodily injury to another, as defined in s. 350 327.353, commits a felony of the third degree, punishable as 351 provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 352 c.âThe death of a any human being, or an unborn child as 353 defined in s. 775.021(5), commits BUI manslaughter, and commits: 354 (I)âA felony of the second degree, punishable as provided 355 in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 356 (II)âA felony of the first degree, punishable as provided 357 in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084, if: 358 (A)âAt the time of the accident, the person knew, or should 359 have known, that the accident occurred; and 360 (B)âThe person failed to give information and render aid as 361 required by s. 327.30. 362 363 A person convicted of BUI manslaughter must be sentenced to a 364 mandatory term of imprisonment of 4 years. Sub-subparagraph 3.c. 365 This sub-sub-subparagraph does not require that the person knew 366 that the accident resulted in injury or death. 367 (III)âA felony of the first degree, punishable as provided 368 in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084, if the person has a 369 prior conviction under this sub-subparagraph, s. 370 316.193(3)(c)3., s. 782.071, or s. 782.072. 371 (b)âA person who is convicted of BUI manslaughter must 372 shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of imprisonment 373 of 4 years. 374 (4)âA Any person who is convicted of violating a violation 375 of subsection (1) and who has a blood-alcohol level or breath 376 alcohol level of 0.15 or higher, or any person who is convicted 377 of violating a violation of subsection (1) and who at the time 378 of the offense was accompanied in the vessel by a person under 379 the age of 18 years of age, is subject to shall be punished: 380 (a)âBy A fine of: 381 1.âNot less than $1,000 or more than $2,000 for a first 382 conviction. 383 2.âNot less than $2,000 or more than $4,000 for a second 384 conviction. 385 3.âNot less than $4,000 for a third or subsequent 386 conviction. 387 (b)âBy Imprisonment for: 388 1.âNot more than 9 months for a first conviction. 389 2.âNot more than 12 months for a second conviction. 390 (c)âIn addition to the penalties provided in paragraphs (a) 391 and (b), the mandatory placement of an ignition interlock device 392 as ordered by the court and approved by the department in 393 accordance with s. 316.1938 upon all vehicles and vessels that 394 are individually or jointly leased or owned and routinely 395 operated by the convicted person, when the convicted person 396 qualifies for a permanent or restricted license. The ignition 397 interlock device must be installed at the convicted personâs 398 sole expense for not less than 6 continuous months for the first 399 offense and for not less than 2 continuous years for a second 400 offense. 401 402 The clerk shall remit the portion of a fine imposed in excess of 403 $1,000 pursuant to subparagraph (a)1. and the portion of a fine 404 imposed in excess of $2,000 pursuant to subparagraph (a)2. or 405 subparagraph (a)3., shall be remitted by the clerk to the 406 Department of Revenue for deposit into the General Revenue Fund. 407 For the purposes of this subsection, only the instant offense is 408 required to be a violation of subsection (1) by a person who has 409 a blood-alcohol level or breath-alcohol level of 0.15 or higher. 410 (5)âIn addition to any sentence or fine, the court shall 411 place any offender convicted of violating this section on 412 monthly reporting probation and shall require attendance at a 413 substance abuse course specified by the court.; and 414 (a)âThe agency conducting the substance abuse course may 415 refer the offender to an authorized service provider for 416 substance abuse evaluation and treatment, which must include a 417 psychosocial evaluation of the offender, in addition to any 418 sentence or fine imposed under this section. If the agency 419 conducting the substance abuse course makes such a referral in 420 addition to any sentence or fine imposed under this section, the 421 completion of all such education, evaluation, and treatment is a 422 condition of reporting probation. The offender shall assume 423 reasonable costs for such education, evaluation, and treatment, 424 with completion of all such education, evaluation, and treatment 425 being a condition of reporting probation. A referral to 426 treatment resulting from a psychosocial evaluation may not be 427 waived without a supporting independent psychosocial evaluation 428 conducted by an authorized substance abuse treatment provider 429 agency appointed by the court. The provider must be provided 430 access to the agencyâs substance abuse courseâs psychosocial 431 evaluation before the independent psychosocial evaluation is 432 conducted and with access to the original evaluation. The 433 offender shall bear the cost of this procedure. The court shall 434 review the results and recommendations of both evaluations 435 before determining the request for a waiver. 436 (b)âIf an offender is referred to treatment under this 437 subsection and he or she fails to report for or complete such 438 treatment or fails to complete the agencyâs substance abuse 439 education course and evaluation, the agency must notify the 440 court and the department of the failure. Upon receipt of the 441 notice, the department must cancel the offenderâs driving 442 privilege, notwithstanding the terms of the court order or any 443 suspension or revocation of the driving privilege. The 444 department may temporarily reinstate the driving privilege on a 445 restricted basis upon verification from the agency that the 446 offender is currently participating in treatment and that both 447 the substance abuse education course and evaluation requirement 448 have been completed. If the agency notifies the department of a 449 second failure to complete treatment, the department may 450 reinstate the driving privilege only after notice of completion 451 of treatment from the agency. 452 (c)âAn agency that conducts an offenderâs substance abuse 453 education and evaluation may not provide required substance 454 abuse treatment unless a waiver has been granted to that 455 organization by the department. A waiver may be granted only if 456 the department, in accordance with department rule, determines 457 that the service provider conducting the substance abuse 458 education and evaluation is the most appropriate service 459 provider and is licensed under chapter 397 or is exempt from 460 such licensure. Organizations authorized to provide services 461 under this section must submit quarterly statistical referral 462 reports to the department. 463 (d)âAs used in this subsection, the term âsubstance abuseâ 464 means the abuse of alcohol or any substance named or described 465 in Schedules I-V of s. 893.03. 466 (6)âWith respect to a any person convicted of violating a 467 violation of subsection (1), regardless of any other penalty 468 imposed: 469 (a)âFor the first conviction, the court shall place the 470 defendant on probation for a period not to exceed 1 year and, as 471 a condition of such probation, shall order the defendant to 472 participate in public service or a community work project for a 473 minimum of 50 hours. The court must also, as a condition of 474 probation, order the impoundment or immobilization of the vessel 475 that was operated by or in the actual control of the defendant 476 or any one vehicle registered in the defendantâs name at the 477 time of impoundment or immobilization, for a period of 10 days 478 or for the unexpired term of any lease or rental agreement that 479 expires within 10 days. The impoundment or immobilization may 480 must not occur concurrently with the incarceration of the 481 defendant. The impoundment or immobilization order may be 482 dismissed in accordance with paragraph (e), or paragraph (f), or 483 paragraph (g). The total period of probation and incarceration 484 may not exceed 1 year. 485 (b)âFor the second conviction for an offense that occurs 486 within a period of 5 years after the date of a prior conviction 487 for violation of this section, the court shall order 488 imprisonment for not less than 10 days. The court may order a 489 defendant to pay a fine of $10 for each hour of public service 490 or community work otherwise required only if the court finds 491 that the residence or location of the defendant at the time 492 public service or community work is required or the defendantâs 493 employment obligations would create an undue hardship for the 494 defendant. However, the total period of probation and 495 incarceration may not exceed 1 year. The court shall must also, 496 as a condition of probation, order the impoundment or 497 immobilization of the vessel that was operated by or in the 498 actual control of the defendant or any one vehicle registered in 499 the defendantâs name at the time of impoundment or 500 immobilization, for a period of 10 30 days or for the unexpired 501 term of any lease or rental agreement that expires within 10 30 502 days. The impoundment or immobilization must not occur 503 concurrently with the incarceration of the defendant. The 504 impoundment or immobilization order may be dismissed in 505 accordance with paragraph (e), or paragraph (f), or paragraph 506 (g). At least 48 hours of confinement must be consecutive. 507 (c)âFor the third or subsequent conviction for an offense 508 that occurs within a period of 10 years after the date of a 509 prior conviction for violation of this section, the court shall 510 order imprisonment for not less than 30 days. The court shall 511 must also, as a condition of probation, order the impoundment or 512 immobilization of the vessel that was operated by or in the 513 actual control of the defendant or any one vehicle registered in 514 the defendantâs name at the time of impoundment or 515 immobilization, for a period of 90 days or for the unexpired 516 term of any lease or rental agreement that expires within 90 517 days. The impoundment or immobilization must not occur 518 concurrently with the incarceration of the defendant. The 519 impoundment or immobilization order may be dismissed in 520 accordance with paragraph (e), or paragraph (f), or paragraph 521 (g). At least 48 hours of confinement must be consecutive. 522 (d)âThe court shall must at the time of sentencing the 523 defendant issue an order for the impoundment or immobilization 524 of a vessel. Within 7 business days after the date that the 525 court issues the order of impoundment, and once again 30 526 business days before the actual impoundment or immobilization of 527 the vessel, the clerk of the court must send notice by certified 528 mail, return receipt requested, to the registered owner of each 529 vessel, if the registered owner is a person other than the 530 defendant, and to each person of record claiming a lien against 531 the vessel. 532 (e)âA person who owns but was not operating the vessel when 533 the offense occurred may submit to the court a police report 534 indicating that the vessel was stolen at the time of the offense 535 or documentation of having purchased the vessel after the 536 offense was committed from an entity other than the defendant or 537 the defendantâs agent. If the court finds that the vessel was 538 stolen or that the sale was not made to circumvent the order and 539 allow the defendant continued access to the vessel, the order 540 must be dismissed and the owner of the vessel will incur no 541 costs. If the court denies the request to dismiss the order of 542 impoundment or immobilization, the petitioner may request an 543 evidentiary hearing. 544 (f)âA person who owns but was not operating the vessel when 545 the offense occurred, and whose vessel was stolen or who 546 purchased the vessel after the offense was committed directly 547 from the defendant or the defendantâs agent, may request an 548 evidentiary hearing to determine whether the impoundment or 549 immobilization should occur. If the court finds that either the 550 vessel was stolen or the purchase was made without knowledge of 551 the offense, that the purchaser had no relationship to the 552 defendant other than through the transaction, and that such 553 purchase would not circumvent the order and allow the defendant 554 continued access to the vessel, the order must be dismissed and 555 the owner of the vessel will incur no costs. 556 (g)âAll costs and fees for the impoundment or 557 immobilization, including the cost of notification, must be paid 558 by the owner of the vessel or, if the vessel is leased or 559 rented, by the person leasing or renting the vessel, unless the 560 impoundment or immobilization order is dismissed. 561 (h)âThe person who owns a vessel that is impounded or 562 immobilized under this paragraph, or a person who has a lien of 563 record against such a vessel and who has not requested a review 564 of the impoundment pursuant to paragraph (e) or paragraph (f), 565 may, within 10 days after the date that person has knowledge of 566 the location of the vessel, file a complaint in the county in 567 which the owner resides to determine whether the vessel was 568 wrongfully taken or withheld from the owner or lienholder. Upon 569 the filing of a complaint, the owner or lienholder may have the 570 vessel released by posting with the court a bond or other 571 adequate security equal to the amount of the costs and fees for 572 impoundment or immobilization, including towing or storage, to 573 ensure the payment of the costs and fees if the owner or 574 lienholder does not prevail. When the bond is posted and the fee 575 is paid as set forth in s. 28.24, the clerk of the court shall 576 issue a certificate releasing the vessel. At the time of 577 release, after reasonable inspection, the owner or lienholder 578 must give a receipt to the towing or storage company indicating 579 any loss or damage to the vessel or to the contents of the 580 vessel. 581 (i)âA defendant, in the courtâs discretion, may be required 582 to serve all or any portion of a term of imprisonment to which 583 the defendant has been sentenced pursuant to this section in a 584 residential alcoholism treatment program or a residential drug 585 abuse treatment program. Any time spent in such a program must 586 be credited by the court toward the term of imprisonment. 587 588 For the purposes of this section, any conviction for a violation 589 of s. 316.193, a previous conviction for the violation of former 590 s. 316.1931, former s. 860.01, or former s. 316.028, or a 591 previous conviction outside this state for driving under the 592 influence, driving while intoxicated, driving with an unlawful 593 blood-alcohol level, driving with an unlawful breath-alcohol 594 level, or any other similar alcohol-related or drug-related 595 traffic offense, is also considered a previous conviction for 596 violation of this section. 597 (10)âNotwithstanding any sentence or fine imposed by law or 598 the court, a person convicted of violating subsection (1) and 599 one or more additional criminal violations under this chapter, 600 whether arising from the same incident or from other incidents 601 occurring within the 12 months preceding the violation of 602 subsection (1), must maintain an insurance policy insuring 603 against loss from liability for bodily injury, death, and 604 property damage arising out of the ownership, maintenance, or 605 use of a vessel. Such insurance policy must contain limits of 606 not less than $100,000 for bodily injury liability or death and 607 $50,000 for property damage. A person who operates a vessel 608 without such insurance policy commits a misdemeanor of the 609 second degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 610 775.083. 611 Section 7.âEffective October 1, 2027, paragraph (a) of 612 subsection (1) of section 327.352, Florida Statutes, is amended 613 to read: 614 327.352âTests for alcohol, chemical substances, or 615 controlled substances; implied consent; refusal.â 616 (1)(a)1.âThe Legislature declares that the operation of a 617 vessel is a privilege that must be exercised in a reasonable 618 manner. In order to protect the public health and safety, it is 619 essential that a lawful and effective means of reducing the 620 incidence of boating while impaired or intoxicated be 621 established. Therefore, a person who accepts the privilege 622 extended by the laws of this state of operating a vessel within 623 this state is, by operating such vessel, deemed to have given 624 his or her consent to submit to an approved chemical test or 625 physical test including, but not limited to, an infrared light 626 test of his or her breath for the purpose of determining the 627 alcoholic content of his or her blood or breath if the person is 628 lawfully arrested for any offense allegedly committed while the 629 person was operating a vessel while under the influence of 630 alcoholic beverages. The chemical or physical breath test must 631 be incidental to a lawful arrest and administered at the request 632 of a law enforcement officer who has reasonable cause to believe 633 such person was operating the vessel within this state while 634 under the influence of alcoholic beverages. The administration 635 of a breath test does not preclude the administration of another 636 type of test. The person must shall be told that his or her 637 failure to submit to a any lawful test of his or her breath 638 under this chapter will result in a suspension of the personâs 639 privilege to operate a vessel for a period of 1 year for a first 640 refusal or for a period of 18 months if his or her privilege to 641 operate a vessel has been previously suspended or if he or she 642 has been fined for a prior refusal to submit to a lawful test of 643 his or her breath, urine, or blood as required under this 644 chapter or chapter 316. The person must also be told civil 645 penalty of $500, and that if he or she refuses to submit to a 646 lawful test of his or her breath and he or she has been 647 previously fined under s. 327.35215 or his or her driving 648 privilege has been previously suspended for refusal to submit to 649 any lawful test of his or her breath, urine, or blood, under 650 this chapter or chapter 316, he or she commits a misdemeanor of 651 the first degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 652 775.083, in addition to any other penalties provided by law. The 653 refusal to submit to a chemical or physical breath test upon the 654 request of a law enforcement officer as provided in this section 655 is admissible into evidence in any criminal proceeding. 656 2.âA person who accepts the privilege extended by the laws 657 of this state of operating a vessel within this state is, by 658 operating such vessel, deemed to have given his or her consent 659 to submit to a urine test for the purpose of detecting the 660 presence of chemical substances as set forth in s. 877.111 or 661 controlled substances if the person is lawfully arrested for any 662 offense allegedly committed while the person was operating a 663 vessel while under the influence of chemical substances or 664 controlled substances. The urine test must be incidental to a 665 lawful arrest and administered at a detention facility or any 666 other facility, mobile or otherwise, which is equipped to 667 administer such tests at the request of a law enforcement 668 officer who has reasonable cause to believe such person was 669 operating a vessel within this state while under the influence 670 of chemical substances or controlled substances. The urine test 671 must be administered at a detention facility or any other 672 facility, mobile or otherwise, which is equipped to administer 673 such test in a reasonable manner that will ensure the accuracy 674 of the specimen and maintain the privacy of the individual 675 involved. The administration of a urine test does not preclude 676 the administration of another type of test. The person must 677 shall be told that his or her failure to submit to a any lawful 678 test of his or her urine under this chapter will result in 679 suspension of the personâs privilege to operate a vessel for a 680 period of 1 year for the first refusal, or for a period of 18 681 months if his or her privilege to operate a vessel or to operate 682 a vehicle has been previously suspended under s. 327.35215 or 683 chapter 316. The person must also be told a civil penalty of 684 $500, and that if he or she refuses to submit to a lawful test 685 of his or her urine and he or she has been previously fined 686 under s. 327.35215 or his or her driving privilege has been 687 previously suspended for refusal to submit to any lawful test of 688 his or her breath, urine, or blood, he or she commits a 689 misdemeanor of the first degree, punishable as provided in s. 690 775.082 or s. 775.083, in addition to any other penalties 691 provided by law. The refusal to submit to a urine test upon the 692 request of a law enforcement officer as provided in this section 693 is admissible into evidence in any criminal proceeding. 694 Section 8.âSubsections (1), (2), and (4) of section 695 327.395, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 696 327.395âBoating safety education.â 697 (1)âEffective July 1, 2028, a person operating born on or 698 after January 1, 1988, may not operate a vessel powered by a 699 motor of 10 horsepower or greater must have unless such person 700 has in his or her possession aboard the vessel the documents 701 required by subsection (2). 702 (2)âWhile operating a vessel, a person identified under 703 subsection (1) must have in his or her possession aboard the 704 vessel photographic identification and a Florida boating safety 705 identification card issued by the commission; a state-issued 706 identification card or driver license indicating possession of 707 the Florida boating safety identification card; or photographic 708 identification and a temporary certificate issued or approved by 709 the commission, an International Certificate of Competency, a 710 boating safety card or certificate from another state or United 711 States territory, or a Canadian Pleasure Craft Operator Card, 712 which shows that he or she has done one of the following: 713 (a)âCompleted a commission-approved boating safety 714 education course that meets the minimum requirements established 715 by the National Association of State Boating Law 716 Administrators.; 717 (b)âPassed a temporary certificate examination developed or 718 approved by the commission.; 719 (c)âObtained a valid International Certificate of 720 Competency.; or 721 (d)âCompleted a boating safety education course or 722 equivalency examination in another state, a United States 723 territory, or Canada which meets or exceeds the minimum 724 requirements established by the National Association of State 725 Boating Law Administrators. 726 (4)âA commission-approved boating safety education course 727 or temporary certificate examination developed or approved by 728 the commission must include components regarding all of the 729 following: 730 (a)âDiving vessels, awareness of divers in the water, 731 divers-down warning devices, and the requirements of s. 327.331. 732 (b)âThe danger associated with: 733 1.âA passenger riding on a seat back, gunwale, transom, 734 bow, motor cover, or any other vessel area not designed and 735 designated by the manufacturer for seating. 736 2.âA passenger falling overboard. 737 3.âOperating a vessel with a person in the water near the 738 vessel. 739 4.âStarting a vessel with the engine in gear. 740 5.âLeaving the vessel running when a passenger is boarding 741 or disembarking. 742 6.âBoating under the influence in violation of s. 327.35. 743 (c)âThe proper use and lifesaving benefits of an engine 744 cutoff switch for motorboats and personal watercraft. 745 (d)âHuman trafficking awareness. 746 747 The commission must include the components under this subsection 748 in boating safety education campaigns and in educational 749 materials produced by the commission, as appropriate. 750 Section 9.âSubsections (1), (3), (4) and (5) of section 751 327.731, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 752 327.731âMandatory education for violators.â 753 (1)âA person convicted of a noncriminal infraction as 754 specified in s. 327.73(1)(h)-(k), (m), (o), (p), and (s)-(y) 755 must do all of the following: 756 (a)âEnroll in, attend, and successfully complete, at his or 757 her own expense, one of the following courses, as applicable: 758 1.âFor a person convicted of any two noncriminal 759 infractions within a 24-month period, the boating safety 760 education course provided for in s. 327.395. 761 2.âFor a person convicted of a criminal violation, of a 762 noncriminal infraction under this chapter if the infraction 763 resulted in a reportable boating accident, or of three or more 764 noncriminal infractions within a 36-month period, the boating 765 safety education course provided for in s. 327.395 and a 4-hour 766 course that includes information regarding all of the following: 767 a.âThe boating laws of this state. 768 b.âCauses and prevention of boating accidents. 769 c.âThe importance of wearing personal flotation devices. 770 d.âThe use of common sense and common courtesy while 771 operating a vessel. 772 e.âHow to operate a vessel defensively. a classroom or 773 online boating safety course that is approved by and meets the 774 minimum standards established by commission rule; 775 (b)âFile with the commission within 90 days proof of 776 successful completion of the course.; and 777 (c)âRefrain from operating a vessel until he or she has 778 filed proof of successful completion of the course with the 779 commission. 780 (3)âAs used in For the purposes of this section, the terms 781 âconvictedâ and âconvictionâ mean means a finding of guilt, or 782 the acceptance of a plea of guilty or nolo contendere, 783 regardless of whether or not adjudication was withheld or 784 whether imposition of sentence was withheld, deferred, or 785 suspended. A Any person who operates a vessel on the waters of 786 this state in violation of the provisions of this section 787 commits is guilty of a misdemeanor of the second degree, 788 punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083. 789 (4)âThe commission shall print on the reverse side of the 790 defendantâs copy of the boating citation a notice of the 791 provisions of this section. Upon conviction, the clerk of the 792 court shall notify the defendant that it is unlawful for him or 793 her to operate any vessel until he or she has complied with this 794 section, but failure of the clerk of the court to provide such a 795 notice is shall not be a defense to a charge of unlawful 796 operation of a vessel under subsection (3). 797 (5)âThe commission shall: 798 (a)âMaintain a program to ensure compliance with the 799 mandatory boating safety education requirements under this 800 section. This program must: 801 1.(a)âTrack any citations resulting in a conviction under 802 this section and the disposition of such citations; and. 803 2.(b)âSend specific notices to each person subject to the 804 requirement for mandatory boating safety education. 805 (b)âAdopt rules necessary to implement this section. 806 Section 10.âEffective October 1, 2027, paragraph (c) of 807 subsection (2) of section 119.0712, Florida Statutes, is amended 808 to read: 809 119.0712âExecutive branch agency-specific exemptions from 810 inspection or copying of public records.â 811 (2)âDEPARTMENT OF HIGHWAY SAFETY AND MOTOR VEHICLES.â 812 (c)âE-mail addresses collected by the Department of Highway 813 Safety and Motor Vehicles pursuant to s. 319.40(3), s. 814 320.95(2), or s. 322.08(11) s. 322.08(10) are exempt from s. 815 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. This 816 exemption applies retroactively. 817 Section 11.âParagraph (f) of subsection (3) of section 818 921.0022, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 819 921.0022âCriminal Punishment Code; offense severity ranking 820 chart.â 821 (3)âOFFENSE SEVERITY RANKING CHART 822 (f)âLEVEL 6 823 824 FloridaStatute FelonyDegree Description 825 316.027(2)(b) 2nd Leaving the scene of a crash involving serious bodily injury. 826 316.193(2)(b) 3rd Felony DUI, 4th or subsequent conviction. 827 316.1935(4)(a) 2nd Aggravated fleeing or eluding. 828 327.30(5)(a)3. 2nd Vessel accidents involving serious bodily injury; leaving scene. 829 327.33(3)(a) 3rd Vessel accidents causing serious bodily injury or death but not reckless operation of a vessel. 830 400.9935(4)(c) 2nd Operating a clinic, or offering services requiring licensure, without a license. 831 499.0051(2) 2nd Knowing forgery of transaction history, transaction information, or transaction statement. 832 499.0051(3) 2nd Knowing purchase or receipt of prescription drug from unauthorized person. 833 499.0051(4) 2nd Knowing sale or transfer of prescription drug to unauthorized person. 834 775.0875(1) 3rd Taking firearm from law enforcement officer. 835 784.021(1)(a) 3rd Aggravated assault; deadly weapon without intent to kill. 836 784.021(1)(b) 3rd Aggravated assault; intent to commit felony. 837 784.041 3rd Felony battery; domestic battery by strangulation. 838 784.048(3) 3rd Aggravated stalking; credible threat. 839 784.048(5) 3rd Aggravated stalking of person under 16. 840 784.07(2)(c) 2nd Aggravated assault on law enforcement officer. 841 784.074(1)(b) 2nd Aggravated assault on sexually violent predators facility staff. 842 784.08(2)(b) 2nd Aggravated assault on a person 65 years of age or older. 843 784.081(2) 2nd Aggravated assault on specified official or employee. 844 784.082(2) 2nd Aggravated assault by detained person on visitor or other detainee. 845 784.083(2) 2nd Aggravated assault on code inspector. 846 787.02(2) 3rd False imprisonment; restraining with purpose other than those in s. 787.01. 847 787.025(2)(a) 3rd Luring or enticing a child. 848 790.115(2)(d) 2nd Discharging firearm or weapon on school property. 849 790.161(2) 2nd Make, possess, or throw destructive device with intent to do bodily harm or damage property. 850 790.164(1) 2nd False report concerning bomb, explosive, weapon of mass destruction, act of arson or violence to state property, or use of firearms in violent manner. 851 790.19 2nd Shooting or throwing deadly missiles into dwellings, vessels, or vehicles. 852 794.011(8)(a) 3rd Solicitation of minor to participate in sexual activity by custodial adult. 853 794.05(1) 2nd Unlawful sexual activity with specified minor. 854 800.04(5)(d) 3rd Lewd or lascivious molestation; victim 12 years of age or older but less than 16 years of age; offender less than 18 years. 855 800.04(6)(b) 2nd Lewd or lascivious conduct; offender 18 years of age or older. 856 806.031(2) 2nd Arson resulting in great bodily harm to firefighter or any other person. 857 810.02(3)(c) 2nd Burglary of occupied structure; unarmed; no assault or battery. 858 810.145(8)(b) 2nd Digital voyeurism; certain minor victims; 2nd or subsequent offense. 859 812.014(2)(b)1. 2nd Property stolen $20,000 or more, but less than $100,000, grand theft in 2nd degree. 860 812.014(2)(c)5. 3rd Grand theft; third degree; firearm. 861 812.014(6) 2nd Theft; property stolen $3,000 or more; coordination of others. 862 812.015(9)(a) 2nd Retail theft; property stolen $750 or more; second or subsequent conviction. 863 812.015(9)(b) 2nd Retail theft; aggregated property stolen within 120 days is $3,000 or more; coordination of others. 864 812.015(9)(d) 2nd Retail theft; multiple thefts within specified period. 865 812.015(9)(e) 2nd Retail theft; committed with specified number of other persons and use of social media platform. 866 812.13(2)(c) 2nd Robbery, no firearm or other weapon (strong-arm robbery). 867 817.4821(5) 2nd Possess cloning paraphernalia with intent to create cloned cellular telephones. 868 817.49(2)(b)2. 2nd Willful making of a false report of a crime resulting in death. 869 817.505(4)(b) 2nd Patient brokering; 10 or more patients. 870 817.5695(3)(b) 2nd Exploitation of person 65 years of age or older, value $10,000 or more, but less than $50,000. 871 825.102(1) 3rd Abuse of an elderly person or disabled adult. 872 825.102(3)(c) 3rd Neglect of an elderly person or disabled adult. 873 825.1025(3) 3rd Lewd or lascivious molestation of an elderly person or disabled adult. 874 825.103(3)(c) 3rd Exploiting an elderly person or disabled adult and property is valued at less than $10,000. 875 827.03(2)(c) 3rd Abuse of a child. 876 827.03(2)(d) 3rd Neglect of a child. 877 827.071(5) 3rd Possess, control, or intentionally view any photographic material, motion picture, etc., which includes child pornography. 878 828.126(3) 3rd Sexual activities involving animals. 879 836.05 2nd Threats; extortion. 880 836.10 2nd Written or electronic threats to kill, do bodily injury, or conduct a mass shooting or an act of terrorism. 881 843.12 3rd Aids or assists person to escape. 882 847.011 3rd Distributing, offering to distribute, or possessing with intent to distribute obscene materials depicting minors. 883 847.012 3rd Knowingly using a minor in the production of materials harmful to minors. 884 847.0135(2) 3rd Facilitates sexual conduct of or with a minor or the visual depiction of such conduct. 885 893.131 2nd Distribution of controlled substances resulting in overdose or serious bodily injury. 886 914.23 2nd Retaliation against a witness, victim, or informant, with bodily injury. 887 918.13(2)(b) 2nd Tampering with or fabricating physical evidence relating to a capital felony. 888 944.35(3)(a)2. 3rd Committing malicious battery upon or inflicting cruel or inhuman treatment on an inmate or offender on community supervision, resulting in great bodily harm. 889 944.40 2nd Escapes. 890 944.46 3rd Harboring, concealing, aiding escaped prisoners. 891 944.47(1)(a)5. 2nd Introduction of contraband (firearm, weapon, or explosive) into correctional facility. 892 951.22(1)(i) 3rd Firearm or weapon introduced into county detention facility. 893 Section 12.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 894 made by this act to section 327.395, Florida Statutes, in a 895 reference thereto, subsection (4) of section 327.54, Florida 896 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 897 327.54âLiveries; safety regulations; penalty.â 898 (4)âA livery may not knowingly lease or rent a vessel to a 899 person who is required to comply with s. 327.395 unless such 900 person presents to the livery the documentation required by s. 901 327.395(2) for the operation of a vessel or meets the exemption 902 provided under s. 327.395(6)(f). 903 Section 13.âExcept as otherwise expressly provided in this 904 act, this act shall take effect July 1, 2026.